apertium-ckb.ckb.dix
    <!-- SECTION: Proper nouns -->
    <pardef n="تورکیا__np">
        <e><p><l></l><r><s n="np"/><s n="top"/><s n="sg"/><s n="abs"/></r></p><par n="یش__consonantal"/></e>
        <e><p><l></l><r><s n="np"/><s n="top"/><s n="sg"/><s n="abs"/><j/></r></p><par n="بوون__clt_voc"/></e>
        <e><p><l></l><r><s n="np"/><s n="top"/><s n="sg"/><s n="abs"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l></l><r><s n="np"/><s n="top"/><s n="sg"/><s n="abs"/><j/></r></p><par n="poss__clt"/></e>
        <e><p><l></l><r><s n="np"/><s n="top"/><s n="sg"/><s n="abs"/></r></p><par n="poss__agr"/></e>
        <e><p><l>یە</l><r><s n="np"/><s n="top"/><s n="sg"/><s n="abs"/><s n="ezaclo"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>ی</l><r><s n="np"/><s n="top"/><s n="sg"/><s n="abs"/><s n="ezalos"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>یەک</l><r><s n="np"/><s n="top"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>یەک</l><r><s n="np"/><s n="top"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/><j/></r></p><par n="بوون__clt_cons"/></e>
        <e><p><l>یەک</l><r><s n="np"/><s n="top"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="یش__consonantal"/></e>
        <e><p><l>یەک</l><r><s n="np"/><s n="top"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/><j/></r></p><par n="poss__clt"/></e>
        <e><p><l>یەک</l><r><s n="np"/><s n="top"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="poss__agr"/></e>
        <e><p><l>یە</l><r><s n="np"/><s n="top"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/><s n="ezaclo"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>یەکی</l><r><s n="np"/><s n="top"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/><s n="ezalos"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>ن</l><r><s n="np"/><s n="top"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>ن</l><r><s n="np"/><s n="top"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/><j/></r></p><par n="بوون__clt_cons"/></e>
        <e><p><l>ن</l><r><s n="np"/><s n="top"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="poss__agr"/></e>
        <e><p><l>ن</l><r><s n="np"/><s n="top"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/><j/></r></p><par n="poss__clt"/></e>
        <e><p><l>ن</l><r><s n="np"/><s n="top"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="یش__consonantal"/></e>
        <e><p><l>یە</l><r><s n="np"/><s n="top"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/><s n="ezaclo"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>نی</l><r><s n="np"/><s n="top"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/><s n="ezalos"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>یەکە</l><r><s n="np"/><s n="top"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>یەکە</l><r><s n="np"/><s n="top"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/><j/></r></p><par n="بوون__clt_voc"/></e>
        <e><p><l>یەکە</l><r><s n="np"/><s n="top"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="poss__agr"/></e>
        <e><p><l>یەکە</l><r><s n="np"/><s n="top"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/><j/></r></p><par n="poss__clt"/></e>
        <e><p><l>یەکە</l><r><s n="np"/><s n="top"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="ش__vocalic"/></e>
        <e><p><l>یە</l><r><s n="np"/><s n="top"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/><s n="ezaclo"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>یە</l><r><s n="np"/><s n="top"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/><s n="ezaclo"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>نە</l><r><s n="np"/><s n="top"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/><s n="ezaclo"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>یەکەی</l><r><s n="np"/><s n="top"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/><s n="ezalos"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>یەکان</l><r><s n="np"/><s n="top"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>یەکان</l><r><s n="np"/><s n="top"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/><j/></r></p><par n="بوون__clt_cons"/></e>
        <e><p><l>یەکان</l><r><s n="np"/><s n="top"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="poss__agr"/></e>
        <e><p><l>یەکان</l><r><s n="np"/><s n="top"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/><j/></r></p><par n="poss__clt"/></e>
        <e><p><l>یەکان</l><r><s n="np"/><s n="top"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="یش__consonantal"/></e>
        <e r="LR"><p><l>ییەکان</l><r><s n="np"/><s n="top"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>یەکانی</l><r><s n="np"/><s n="top"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/><s n="ezalos"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>یە</l><r><s n="np"/><s n="top"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dem"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>یە</l><r><s n="np"/><s n="top"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dem"/><s n="ezalos"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>یە</l><r><s n="np"/><s n="top"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dem"/><s n="ezaclo"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>نە</l><r><s n="np"/><s n="top"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dem"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>نە</l><r><s n="np"/><s n="top"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dem"/><j/></r></p><par n="بوون__clt_voc"/></e>
        <e><p><l>نە</l><r><s n="np"/><s n="top"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dem"/></r></p><par n="poss__agr"/></e>
        <e><p><l>نە</l><r><s n="np"/><s n="top"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dem"/><j/></r></p><par n="poss__clt"/></e>
        <e><p><l>نە</l><r><s n="np"/><s n="top"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dem"/></r></p><par n="یش__consonantal"/></e>
        <e><p><l>نە</l><r><s n="np"/><s n="top"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dem"/><s n="ezalos"/></r></p></e>
     </pardef>

      <e lm="ئەورۆپا"><i>ئەورۆپا</i><par n="تورکیا__np"/></e>
      <e lm="ئەسینا"><i>ئەسینا</i><par n="تورکیا__np"/></e>
      <e lm="مەکەدۆنیا"><i>مەکەدۆنیا</i><par n="تورکیا__np"/></e>
      <e lm="سربیا"><i>سربیا</i><par n="تورکیا__np"/></e>
      <e lm="سوریا"><i>سوریا</i><par n="تورکیا__np"/></e>
      <e lm="سالونیکی"><i>سالونیکی</i><par n="تورکیا__np"/></e>
      <e lm="تورکیا"><i>تورکیا</i><par n="تورکیا__np"/></e>
      <e lm="ئەمریکا"><i>ئەمریکا</i><par n="تورکیا__np"/></e>
      <e lm="ئیسپانیا"><i>ئیسپانیا</i><par n="تورکیا__np"/></e>
      <e lm="ئوستڕالیا"><i>ئوستڕالیا</i><par n="تورکیا__np"/></e>
      <e lm="ئەورووپا"><i>ئەورووپا</i><par n="تورکیا__np"/></e>
      <e lm="ئەلاباما"><i>ئەلاباما</i><par n="تورکیا__np"/></e>
      <e lm="فەڕەنسا"><i>فەڕەنسا</i><par n="تورکیا__np"/></e>
      <e lm="ئاسیا"><i>ئاسیا</i><par n="تورکیا__np"/></e>
      <e lm="بولگاریا"><i>بولگاریا</i><par n="تورکیا__np"/></e>
      <e lm="فەڕەنسا"><i>فەڕەنسا</i><par n="تورکیا__np"/></e>
      <e lm="ڕووسیا"><i>ڕووسیا</i><par n="تورکیا__np"/></e>
      <e lm="ئەمەریکا"><i>ئەمەریکا</i><par n="تورکیا__np"/></e>
      <e lm="سووریا"><i>سووریا</i><par n="تورکیا__np"/></e>
      <e lm="ئەفریقا"><i>ئەفریقا</i><par n="تورکیا__np"/></e>
      <e lm="ئیتالیا"><i>ئیتالیا</i><par n="تورکیا__np"/></e>
      <e lm="ئیتالیا"><i>ئیتالیا</i><par n="تورکیا__np"/></e>
      <e lm="بەریتانیا"><i>بەریتانیا</i><par n="تورکیا__np"/></e>
      <e lm="نەمسا"><i>نەمسا</i><par n="تورکیا__np"/></e>
      <e lm="بریتانیا"><i>بریتانیا</i><par n="تورکیا__np"/></e>
      <e lm="کەنەدا"><i>کەنەدا</i><par n="تورکیا__np"/></e>
      <e lm="کرواتیا"><i>کرواتیا</i><par n="تورکیا__np"/></e>
      <e lm="کۆریا"><i>کۆریا</i><par n="تورکیا__np"/></e>
